Tennessee, session 114, SB1003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-105, is amended by deleting
subsections (g) and (h) and by designating the existing language of subsection (e) as
subdivision (e)(1) and adding the following new subdivisions:
(2) The state board shall approve at least one (1) universal screener for pre-
kindergarten students to be used as an alternative growth model for purposes of
subdivision (e)(1) to generate individual growth scores for pre-kindergarten teachers
pursuant to the evaluation guidelines developed by the department. The universal
screener approved by the state board to evaluate pre-kindergarten teachers must not be
based on the pre-k/kindergarten portfolio growth model.
(3) LEAs and public charter schools that provide a voluntary pre-kindergarten
program shall allow pre-kindergarten teachers to use the results of a universal screener
approved by the state board pursuant to subdivision (e)(2) as an alternative growth
model to generate individual growth scores for pre-kindergarten teachers.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1508, is amended by deleting
subsection (d) and substituting instead the following:
(d) LEAs and public charter schools may allow teachers in the non-tested grades
kindergarten through two (K-2) to use the results of the Tennessee universal math
screener, the Tennessee universal reading screener, or a universal reading screener
approved by the state board of education, as described in subsection (b), as an
SB1003
003074
- 1 -

alternative growth model for purposes of §§ 49-1-302(d)(2)(B)(ix) and 49-6-105(e) to
generate individual growth scores for such teachers pursuant to the evaluation
guidelines developed by the department. The department shall not base the Tennessee
universal math screener, the Tennessee universal reading screener, or a universal
reading screener approved by the state board of education used to evaluate teachers
pursuant to this subsection (d) on the pre-k/kindergarten portfolio growth model.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to the 2025-2026 school year and each school year thereafter.
- 2 - 003074